Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-438
High voltage lines;
tools, equipment, materials, or buildings; operation, movement, or erection;
use; conditions.

(1) Except as provided in subsections
(2) and (3) of this section, the operation or erection of any tools, machinery, or equipment, or any part
thereof capable of vertical, lateral, or
swinging motion, or the handling or storage
of any supplies, materials, or
apparatus or the moving of any house or other building, or any part thereof,
under, over, by, or
near overhead high voltage conductors, shall be prohibited if, at any time during such operation or other manipulation, it is possible to bring
such equipment, tools, materials, building, or
any part thereof within ten feet of such overhead high voltage conductors, except
where such high voltage conductors have been effectively guarded against danger
from accidental contact, by any of the following:

(a) Erection of mechanical barriers
to prevent physical contact with high voltage conductors;

(b) Deenergizing of the high voltage conductors and grounding
where necessary; or

(c) Temporary relocation of overhead high voltage conductors.

(2) The minimum distance required by this section for cranes
or other boom type equipment in transit with no load and with raiseable portions
lowered shall be four feet.

(3) Nothing in sections 48-436 to 48-442 shall prohibit the
moving of general farm equipment under high
voltage conductors where clearances required by sections 48-436
to 48-442 are maintained.

(4) The activities
performed as described in subdivisions (1)(a), (b), and (c) of this section
shall be performed only by the owner or operator of the high voltage conductors
unless written authorization has been obtained from such owner or operator.
This subsection shall not be construed to apply to activities performed by
an electric utility on high voltage conductors of another electric utility
when the electric utilities have a written agreement (a) providing for joint
use of poles or structures supporting the high voltage conductors of the electric
utilities or (b) approving the nonowning electric utility's performance of
the activities described in subdivisions (1)(a), (b), and (c) of this section
on an ongoing basis on the owning or operating electric utility's high voltage
conductors.

Laws 1969, c. 390, § 3, p. 1371;

Laws 2012, LB997, § 3.